Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.26
Lead-based paint, defined.

Lead-based paint means paint or other surface coatings that contain lead equal to or in excess of one milligram per square centimeter or more than five-tenths of one percent by weight in a residential dwelling or child-occupied facility.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 28.